North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 8A. HAVA Administrative Complaint Procedure.

§ 163-91.
Complaint procedure.

The State Board of Elections shall establish a complaint procedure as required by section 402 of Title IV of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 for the resolution of complaints alleging violations of Title III of that Act.

, (c) Repealed by Session Laws 2018-146, s. 4.5(d), effective December 27, 2018.

History.
2003-226, s. 17(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.5(d).

§§ 163-92 through 163-95.

Reserved for future codification purposes.